finnish.large.aff
flag *U:
   A >	KSENI
   A >	KSESI
   A >	KSENSA
   A >	KSENI
   A >	KSEMME
   A >	KSENNE
   A >	KSEEN
   A >	KSENIKIN
   A >	KSENIKAAN
   A >	KSENIKO
   A >	KSENIPA
   A >	KSENIHAN
   A >	KSENIKINKO
   A >	KSENIKAANKO
   A >	KSENIKOHAN
   A >	KSENIPAHAN
   A >	KSESIKIN
   A >	KSESIKAAN
   A >	KSESIKO
   A >	KSESIPA
   A >	KSESIHAN
   A >	KSESIKINKO
   A >	KSESIKAANKO
   A >	KSESIKOHAN
   A >	KSESIPAHAN
   A >	KSENSAKIN
   A >	KSENSAKAAN
   A >	KSENSAKO
   A >	KSENSAPA
   A >	KSENSAHAN
   A >	KSENSAKINKO
   A >	KSENSAKAANKO
   A >	KSENSAKOHAN
   A >	KSENSAPAHAN
   A >	KSENIKIN
   A >	KSENIKAAN
   A >	KSENIKO
   A >	KSENIPA
   A >	KSENIHAN
   A >	KSENIKINKO
   A >	KSENIKAANKO
   A >	KSENIKOHAN
   A >	KSENIPAHAN
   A >	KSEMMEKIN
   A >	KSEMMEKAAN
   A >	KSEMMEKO
   A >	KSEMMEPA
   A >	KSEMMEHAN
   A >	KSEMMEKINKO
   A >	KSEMMEKAANKO
   A >	KSEMMEKOHAN
   A >	KSEMMEPAHAN
   A >	KSENNEKIN
   A >	KSENNEKAAN
   A >	KSENNEKO
   A >	KSENNEPA
   A >	KSENNEHAN
   A >	KSENNEKINKO
   A >	KSENNEKAANKO
   A >	KSENNEKOHAN
   A >	KSENNEPAHAN
   A >	KSEENKIN
   A >	KSEENKAAN
   A >	KSEENKO
   A >	KSEENPA
   A >	KSEENHAN
   A >	KSEENKINKO
   A >	KSEENKAANKO
   A >	KSEENKOHAN
   A >	KSEENPAHAN
   E A >	-EA,IESSA
   E A >	-EA,IEN
   E A >	-EA,IESSAKIN
   E A >	-EA,IESSAKAAN
   E A >	-EA,IESSAKO
   E A >	-EA,IESSAPA
   E A >	-EA,IESSAHAN
   E A >	-EA,IESSAKINKO
   E A >	-EA,IESSAKAANKO
   E A >	-EA,IESSAKOHAN
   E A >	-EA,IESSAPAHAN
   E A >	-EA,IENKIN
   E A >	-EA,IENKAAN
   E A >	-EA,IENKO
   E A >	-EA,IENPA
   E A >	-EA,IENHAN
   E A >	-EA,IENKINKO
   E A >	-EA,IENKAANKO
   E A >	-EA,IENKOHAN
   E A >	-EA,IENPAHAN
   E A >	-EA,IESSANIKIN
   E A >	-EA,IESSANIKAAN
   E A >	-EA,IESSANIKO
   E A >	-EA,IESSANIPA
   E A >	-EA,IESSANIHAN
   E A >	-EA,IESSANIKINKO
   E A >	-EA,IESSANIKAANKO
   E A >	-EA,IESSANIKOHAN
   E A >	-EA,IESSANIPAHAN
   E A >	-EA,IESSASIKIN
   E A >	-EA,IESSASIKAAN
   E A >	-EA,IESSASIKO
   E A >	-EA,IESSASIPA
   E A >	-EA,IESSASIHAN
   E A >	-EA,IESSASIKINKO
   E A >	-EA,IESSASIKAANKO
   E A >	-EA,IESSASIKOHAN
   E A >	-EA,IESSASIPAHAN
   E A >	-EA,IESSANSAKIN
   E A >	-EA,IESSANSAKAAN
   E A >	-EA,IESSANSAKO
   E A >	-EA,IESSANSAPA
   E A >	-EA,IESSANSAHAN
   E A >	-EA,IESSANSAKINKO
   E A >	-EA,IESSANSAKAANKO
   E A >	-EA,IESSANSAKOHAN
   E A >	-EA,IESSANSAPAHAN
   E A >	-EA,IESSAMMEKIN
   E A >	-EA,IESSAMMEKAAN
   E A >	-EA,IESSAMMEKO
   E A >	-EA,IESSAMMEPA
   E A >	-EA,IESSAMMEHAN
   E A >	-EA,IESSAMMEKINKO
   E A >	-EA,IESSAMMEKAANKO
   E A >	-EA,IESSAMMEKOHAN
   E A >	-EA,IESSAMMEPAHAN
   E A >	-EA,IESSANNEKIN
   E A >	-EA,IESSANNEKAAN
   E A >	-EA,IESSANNEKO
   E A >	-EA,IESSANNEPA
   E A >	-EA,IESSANNEHAN
   E A >	-EA,IESSANNEKINKO
   E A >	-EA,IESSANNEKAANKO
   E A >	-EA,IESSANNEKOHAN
   E A >	-EA,IESSANNEPAHAN
   E A >	-EA,IESSAANKIN
   E A >	-EA,IESSAANKAAN
   E A >	-EA,IESSAANKO
   E A >	-EA,IESSAANPA
   E A >	-EA,IESSAANHAN
   E A >	-EA,IESSAANKINKO
   E A >	-EA,IESSAANKAANKO
   E A >	-EA,IESSAANKOHAN
   E A >	-EA,IESSAANPAHAN
   E A >	-EA,IESSANI
   E A >	-EA,IESSASI
   E A >	-EA,IESSANSA
   E A >	-EA,IESSAMME
   E A >	-EA,IESSANNE
   E A >	-EA,IESSAAN
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSA
   [^E] A >	-A,EN
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSAKIN
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSAKAAN
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSAKO
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSAPA
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSAHAN
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSAKINKO
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSAKAANKO
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSAKOHAN
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSAPAHAN
   [^E] A >	-A,ENKIN
   [^E] A >	-A,ENKAAN
   [^E] A >	-A,ENKO
   [^E] A >	-A,ENPA
   [^E] A >	-A,ENHAN
   [^E] A >	-A,ENKINKO
   [^E] A >	-A,ENKAANKO
   [^E] A >	-A,ENKOHAN
   [^E] A >	-A,ENPAHAN
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSANIKIN
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSANIKAAN
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSANIKO
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSANIPA
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSANIHAN
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSANIKINKO
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSANIKAANKO
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSANIKOHAN
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSANIPAHAN
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSASIKIN
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSASIKAAN
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSASIKO
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSASIPA
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSASIHAN
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSASIKINKO
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSASIKAANKO
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSASIKOHAN
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSASIPAHAN
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSANSAKIN
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSANSAKAAN
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSANSAKO
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSANSAPA
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSANSAHAN
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSANSAKINKO
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSANSAKAANKO
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSANSAKOHAN
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSANSAPAHAN
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSAMMEKIN
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSAMMEKAAN
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSAMMEKO
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSAMMEPA
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSAMMEHAN
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSAMMEKINKO
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSAMMEKAANKO
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSAMMEKOHAN
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSAMMEPAHAN
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSANNEKIN
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSANNEKAAN
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSANNEKO
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSANNEPA
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSANNEHAN
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSANNEKINKO
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSANNEKAANKO
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSANNEKOHAN
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSANNEPAHAN
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSAANKIN
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSAANKAAN
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSAANKO
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSAANPA
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSAANHAN
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSAANKINKO
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSAANKAANKO
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSAANKOHAN
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSAANPAHAN
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSANI
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSASI
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSANSA
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSAMME
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSANNE
   [^E] A >	-A,ESSAAN
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NUT
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NEET
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NET
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NEE
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NEMME
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NETTE
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NEVAT
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NUTKIN
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NUTKO
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NUTKAAN
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NUTHAN
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NUTPA
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NUTKOHAN
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NEETKIN
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NEETKO
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NEETKAAN
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NEETHAN
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NEETPA
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NEETKOHAN
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NETKIN
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NETKO
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NETKAAN
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NETHAN
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NETPA
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NETKOHAN
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NEEKIN
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NEEKO
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NEEKAAN
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NEEHAN
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NEEPA
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NEEKOHAN
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NEMMEKIN
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NEMMEKO
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NEMMEKAAN
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NEMMEHAN
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NEMMEPA
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NEMMEKOHAN
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NETTEKIN
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NETTEKO
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NETTEKAAN
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NETTEHAN
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NETTEPA
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NETTEKOHAN
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NEVATKIN
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NEVATKO
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NEVATKAAN
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NEVATHAN
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NEVATPA
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NEVATKOHAN
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NE
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NEN
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NENKIN
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NENKO
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NENKAAN
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NENHAN
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NENPA
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,NENKOHAN
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,KAA
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,KAAKIN
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,KAAHAN
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,KAAPA
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,KOON
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,KOOT
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,KAAMME
   [AEIOU] A >	-A,KO
   [^S] T A >	AN
   [^S] T A >	ANKIN
   [^S] T A >	ANKO
   [^S] T A >	ANKAAN
   [^S] T A >	ANHAN
   [^S] T A >	ANPA
   [^S] T A >	ANKOHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TIIN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAISIIN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAESSA
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVA
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVAA
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVASSA
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVASTA
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVAAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVALLA
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVALTA
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVALLE
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVANA
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVAKSI
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVAT
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVIA
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVIEN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVISSA
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVISTA
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVIIN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVILLA
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVILTA
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVILLE
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVINA
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVIKSI
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVIN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TIINKIN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TIINKO
   [^S] T A >	-A,TIINKAAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TIINHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TIINPA
   [^S] T A >	-A,TIINKOHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAISIINKIN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAISIINKO
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAISIINKAAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAISIINHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAISIINPA
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAISIINKOHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAESSAKIN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAESSAKO
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAESSAKAAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAESSAHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAESSAPA
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAESSAKOHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVAKIN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVAKO
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVAKAAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVAHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVAPA
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVAKOHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVAAKIN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVAAKO
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVAAKAAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVAAHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVAAPA
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVAAKOHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVANKIN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVANKO
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVANKAAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVANHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVANPA
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVANKOHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVASSAKIN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVASSAKO
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVASSAKAAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVASSAHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVASSAPA
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVASSAKOHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVASTAKIN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVASTAKO
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVASTAKAAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVASTAHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVASTAPA
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVASTAKOHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVAANKIN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVAANKO
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVAANKAAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVAANHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVAANPA
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVAANKOHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVALLAKIN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVALLAKO
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVALLAKAAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVALLAHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVALLAPA
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVALLAKOHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVALTAKIN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVALTAKO
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVALTAKAAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVALTAHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVALTAPA
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVALTAKOHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVALLEKIN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVALLEKO
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVALLEKAAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVALLEHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVALLEPA
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVALLEKOHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVANAKIN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVANAKO
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVANAKAAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVANAHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVANAPA
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVANAKOHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVAKSIKIN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVAKSIKO
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVAKSIKAAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVAKSIHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVAKSIPA
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVAKSIKOHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVATKIN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVATKO
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVATKAAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVATHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVATPA
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVATKOHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVIAKIN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVIAKO
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVIAKAAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVIAHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVIAPA
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVIAKOHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVIENKIN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVIENKO
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVIENKAAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVIENHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVIENPA
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVIENKOHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVISSAKIN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVISSAKO
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVISSAKAAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVISSAHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVISSAPA
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVISSAKOHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVISTAKIN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVISTAKO
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVISTAKAAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVISTAHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVISTAPA
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVISTAKOHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVIINKIN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVIINKO
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVIINKAAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVIINHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVIINPA
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVIINKOHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVILLAKIN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVILLAKO
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVILLAKAAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVILLAHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVILLAPA
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVILLAKOHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVILTAKIN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVILTAKO
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVILTAKAAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVILTAHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVILTAPA
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVILTAKOHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVILLEKIN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVILLEKO
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVILLEKAAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVILLEHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVILLEPA
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVILLEKOHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVINAKIN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVINAKO
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVINAKAAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVINAHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVINAPA
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVINAKOHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVIKSIKIN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVIKSIKO
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVIKSIKAAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVIKSIHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVIKSIPA
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVIKSIKOHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVINKIN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVINKO
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVINKAAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVINHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVINPA
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAVINKOHAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAISI
   [^S] T A >	-A,TU
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAISIKAAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TUKAAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAMAN
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAKOON
   [^S] T A >	-A,TAKO
   [^S] T A >	-A,TANEEN
